Missouri, session 2026, HB3433.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 452.402, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 452.402, to read as follows:
452.402. 1. The court may grant reasonable visitation rights to the grandparents of
the child and issue any necessary orders to enforce the decree when a grandparent has been
unreasonably denied visitation for a period exceeding sixty days, and:
(1) The parents of the child have filed for a dissolution of their marriage. A
grandparent shall have the right to intervene in any dissolution action solely on the issue of
visitation rights. Grandparents shall also have the right to file a motion to modify the original
decree of dissolution to seek visitation rights when visitation has been denied to them;
(2) One parent of the child is deceased and the surviving parent denies reasonable
visitation to a parent of the deceased parent of the child; [or]
(3) The parents of the child were never married and the parent with custodial
rights has denied reasonable visitation to a grandparent; or
[(3)] (4) The child has resided in the grandparent's home for at least six months within
the twenty-four month period immediately preceding the filing of the petition.

[Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection, if the natural parents are
legally married to each other and are living together with the child, a grandparent may not file
for visitation pursuant to this subsection.]
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3433 2
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law, if a grandparent has been denied
reasonable visitation with a child for a period exceeding sixty days and an action
involving custody or visitation has been adjudicated, the grandparent may file seeking
visitation with the child. A grandparent also has the right to file a motion for an
independent action if no prior custody or visitation order exists to seek visitation rights
if reasonable visitation has been denied.
3. Before ordering visitation, the court shall, in addition to the requirements of
subsection 1 of this section, determine if the visitation by the grandparent would be in the
child's best interests. Visitation may only be ordered when the court finds such visitation to
be in the best interests of the child. The court may order reasonable conditions or restrictions
on grandparent visitation.
[3.] 4. If the court finds it to be in the best interests of the child, the court may appoint
a guardian ad litem for the child. The guardian ad litem shall be an attorney licensed to
practice law in Missouri. The guardian ad litem may, for the purpose of determining the
question of grandparent visitation rights, participate in the proceedings as if such guardian ad
litem were a party. The court shall enter judgment allowing a reasonable fee to the guardian
ad litem.
[4.] 5. A home study, as described by section 452.390, may be ordered by the court to
assist in determining the best interests of the child.
[5.] 6. The court may, in its discretion, consult with the child regarding the child's
wishes in determining the best interest of the child.
[6.] 7. The right of a grandparent to maintain visitation rights pursuant to this section
may terminate upon the adoption of the child.
[7.] 8. The court may award reasonable attorneys fees and expenses to the prevailing
party.
9. Visitation provided to a grandparent after filing an action under this section
shall not terminate or extinguish a grandparent's right to seek relief under this section.
If the parties reach an agreement regarding grandparent visitation, the court may enter
an order confirming such agreement if the agreement is found to be in the best interests
of the child. The court may impose additional conditions or restrictions as found to be
appropriate by the court.
✔